Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-237
Person, owner, proprietor, grantee, lessee, and licensee, defined.

Person, owner, proprietor, grantee, lessee, and licensee means and includes individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, corporations, and municipalities.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 47.